Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.61.050

Defrauding a public utility in the third degree.

(1) A person is guilty of defrauding a public utility in the third degree if:

(a) The utility service diverted or used is five hundred dollars or less in value; or

(b) A connection or reconnection has occurred without authorization or consent of the utility.

(2) Defrauding a public utility in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1989 c 109 s 5.]